District of Columbia statutes.
47-1363

Rights of owners and purchasers during redemption period; appointment of receiver of real property.

(a)

The owner of a real property sold under this chapter shall have the right, during the period of redemption, to continue in possession of, and to exercise all rights of ownership over, the real property until the right of redemption has been finally foreclosed under the provisions of subchapter IV of this chapter; provided, that a purchaser may apply to the Superior Court for the appointment of a receiver of the real property covered by the certificate of sale or assignment of the certificate of sale in accordance with the provisions of laws and of rules and practice of the Superior Court that relate to receivers. If a certificate of sale is held by the District or instrumentality thereof, the Mayor or instrumentality of the District may make application by complaint to the Superior Court for the appointment of a receiver of the real property covered by the certificate of sale. The defendant, in an action brought by the Mayor or instrumentality of the District for the appointment of a receiver, shall be the owner of the real property whose name last appears as the owner on the Mayor’s tax roll. Notwithstanding the foregoing, if the real property is vacant or abandoned, a certificate of sale has at any time been issued in the name of the District or instrumentality thereof, and the certificate of sale is presently held by the District or instrumentality thereof, the Mayor or instrumentality of the District shall have the right of immediate possession of the real property from the date of the tax sale without the necessity of receivership proceedings; provided, that the Mayor or instrumentality of the District shall make an accounting of all rents collected to the owner on redemption of the real property, and on redemption, shall remit the rents, less all remuneration for the maintenance and upkeep of the real property. The Mayor or an instrumentality of the District shall not be subject to the expiration of a waiting period or other period before making improvements to the real property. To redeem the vacant or abandoned real property, the person redeeming shall pay the District or instrumentality thereof for the reasonable value of all improvements made by the District or instrumentality thereof to the real property.

(b)

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, the purchaser of a real property at a tax sale shall not have:

(1)

Any rights at law or in equity if the Mayor or instrumentality of the District razes improvements, abates nuisances or environmental infractions, or corrects unsafe conditions, and imposes a fine therefor which may be a lien upon the real property, until the right of redemption has been finally foreclosed under the provisions of subchapter IV of this chapter; or

(2)

Standing to enjoin, or recourse against the District or instrumentality thereof for, the imposition of fines due to noncompliance of the real property or owner thereof with any law of the District or the United States of America.

History

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 507(a)(2), 48 DCR 334
Apr. 4, 2003, D.C. Law 14-282, § 11(jj), 50 DCR 896
Dec. 4, 2014, D.C. Law 20-141, § 101(c)(21), 61 DCR 7763
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, §§ 7102(c)(21), 7104, 61 DCR 9990

Section References

This section is referenced in § 47-1361, § 47-1365, and § 47-1380.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 14-282 designated the existing text as subsec. (a); in the newly designated subsec. (a), substituted “District or instrumentality thereof” for “District”, substituted “Mayor or instrumentality of the District” for “Mayor”, and added the last two sentences; and added subsec. (b).
The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-141, repealed before its effective date, would have rewritten the section.
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 substituted “date of the tax sale” for “date of the sale” in (a).

Temporary Legislation

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 12(oo) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Temporary Act of 2002 (D.C. Law 14-191, October 5, 2002, law notification 49 DCR 9549).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 12(oo) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Temporary Act of 2003 (D.C. Law 14-228, March 23, 2003, law notification 50 DCR 2741).
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-8, June 13, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 5916).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-22, March 16, 2001, 48 DCR 2706).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 12(nn) of Tax Clarity and Recorder of Deeds Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-381, June 6, 2002, 49 DCR 5674).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 12(oo) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-456, July 23, 2002, 49 DCR 8107).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 12(oo) of Tax Clarity and Related Amendments Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-510, October 23, 2002, 49 DCR 10247).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 101(c)(22) of the Residential Real Property Equity and Transparency Emergency Amendment Act of 2014, (D.C. Act 20-342, May 28, 2014, 61 DCR 5691).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7112(c)(21) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 101(c)(22) of the Residential Real Property Equity and Transparency Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-409, Aug. 1, 2014, 61 DCR 8281).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7102(c)(21) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, as amended by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7102(c), see the first § 2(q) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Clarification Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-461, November 6, 2014, 61 DCR 11784, 20 STAT 4368).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7102(c)(21) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, as amended by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7102(c), see the first § 2(q) of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Clarification Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-587, January 13, 2015, 62 DCR 1294, 21 STAT 758).

Editor's Notes

D.C. Law 20-141 became effective on Dec. 4, 2014, but was repealed prior to its effective date by emergency D.C. Act 20-377, § 7114, eff. July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, by emergency D.C. Act 20-449, § 7104, eff. October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, by emergency D.C. Act 20-566, § 7104, eff. January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, and by D.C. Law 20-155, § 7104, 61 DCR 9990.